en: Educational topic: Ecosystems and habitats; Entomology; Environmental science; Life cycles; Observation and microscopy; STEM (science); Other
zh-CN: 教育主题: 生态系统与栖息地; 昆虫学; 环境科学; 生命周期; 观察与显微镜使用; STEM（科学）; 其他
nb: Pedagogisk emne: Økosystemer og habitater; Entomologi; Miljøvitenskap; Livssykluser; Observasjon og mikroskopi; STEM (naturvitenskap); Annet
lt-LT: Mokomoji tema: Ekosistemos ir buveinės; Entomologija; Aplinkos mokslas; Gyvenimo ciklai; Stebėjimas ir mikroskopija; STEM (mokslas); Kita
ko: 교육 주제: 생태계 및 서식지; 곤충학; 환경 과학; 생애 주기; 관찰 및 현미경 사용; STEM(과학); 기타
fi: Oppimissisältö: Ekosysteemit ja elinympäristöt; Hyönteistiede; Ympäristötiede; Elinkaaret; Havainnointi ja mikroskopia; STEM (tiede); Muu
da: Uddannelsesmæssigt emne: Økosystemer og levesteder; Entomologi; Miljøvidenskab; Livscyklusser; Observation og mikroskopi; STEM (videnskab); Andet
pt-BR: Tema educacional: Ecossistemas e habitats; Entomologia; Ciências ambientais; Ciclos de vida; Observação e microscopia; STEM (ciência); Outro
sl-SI: Izobraževalna tema: Ekosistemi in habitati; Entomologija; Okoljska znanost; Življenjski cikli; Opazovanje in mikroskopiranje; STEM (znanost); Drugo
hu: Oktatási téma: Ökoszisztémák és élőhelyek; Rovartan; Környezettudomány; Életciklusok; Megfigyelés és mikroszkópia; STEM (tudomány); Egyéb
sv: Utbildningsämne: Ekosystem och livsmiljöer; Entomologi; Miljövetenskap; Livscykler; Observation och mikroskopi; STEM (vetenskap); Övrigt
bg-BG: Образователна тема: Екосистеми и местообитания; Ентомология; Наука за околната среда; Жизнени цикли; Наблюдение и микроскопия; STEM (наука); Друго
pl: Temat edukacyjny: Ekosystemy i siedliska; Entomologia; Nauki o środowisku; Cykle życia; Obserwacja i mikroskopia; STEM (nauki ścisłe); Inne
tr: Eğitim konusu: Ekosistemler ve habitatlar; Entomoloji; Çevre bilimi; Yaşam döngüleri; Gözlem ve mikroskopi; STEM (bilim); Diğer
it: Argomento educativo: Ecosistemi e habitat; Entomologia; Scienze ambientali; Cicli vitali; Osservazione e microscopia; STEM (scienze); Altro
ja: 教育的なトピック: 生態系と生息地; 昆虫学; 環境科学; ライフサイクル; 観察および顕微鏡法; STEM (科学); その他
vi: Chủ đề giáo dục: Hệ sinh thái và môi trường sống; Côn trùng học; Khoa học môi trường; Vòng đời; Quan sát và hiển vi; STEM (khoa học); Khác
ro-RO: Subiect educațional: Ecosisteme și habitate; Entomologie; Știința mediului; Cicluri de viață; Observare și microscopie; STEM (știință); Altele
hr-HR: Obrazovna tema: Ekosustavi i staništa; Entomologija; Znanost o okolišu; Životni ciklusi; Promatranje i mikroskopija; STEM (znanost); Ostalo
zh-TW: 教育主題: 生態系統與棲息地; 昆蟲學; 環境科學; 生命週期; 觀察與顯微鏡; STEM (科學); 其他
ru: Учебная тема: Экосистемы и среда обитания; Энтомология; Экология; Жизненные циклы; Наблюдение и микроскопия; STEM (наука); Другое
cs: Vzdělávací téma: Ekosystémy a biotopy; Entomologie; Environmentalistika; Životní cykly; Pozorování a mikroskopie; STEM (věda); Jiné
es: Tema educativo: Ecosistemas y hábitats; Entomología; Ciencias ambientales; Ciclos de vida; Observación y microscopía; STEM (ciencia); Otro
el: Εκπαιδευτικό θέμα: Οικοσυστήματα και βιότοποι; Εντομολογία; Περιβαλλοντική επιστήμη; Κύκλοι ζωής; Παρατήρηση και μικροσκοπία; STEM (επιστήμες); Άλλο
de: Lernthema: Ökosysteme und Lebensräume; Entomologie; Umweltwissenschaften; Lebenszyklen; Beobachtung und Mikroskopie; MINT (Naturwissenschaften); Sonstige
fr: Thème pédagogique: Écosystèmes et habitats; Entomologie; Sciences de l’environnement; Cycles de vie; Observation et microscopie; STIM (sciences); Autre
pt-PT: Tema educativo: Ecossistemas e habitats; Entomologia; Ciência ambiental; Ciclos de vida; Observação e microscopia; STEM (ciências); Outro
sk-SK: Vzdelávacia téma: Ekosystémy a biotopy; Entomológia; Environmentalistika; Životné cykly; Pozorovanie a mikroskopia; STEM (veda); Iné
nl: Educatief onderwerp: Ecosystemen en leefgebieden; Entomologie; Milieuwetenschappen; Levenscycli; Observatie en microscopie; STEM (wetenschap); Overige
th: หัวข้อการศึกษา: ระบบนิเวศและถิ่นที่อยู่; กีฏวิทยา; วิทยาศาสตร์สิ่งแวดล้อม; วงจรชีวิต; การสังเกตและจุลทรรศน์; STEM (วิทยาศาสตร์); อื่นๆ